Utah statutes.
72-4-129.   State highways -- SR-232, SR-235, and SR-240.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-232.  From Route 126 in Layton north to the south entrance to Hill Air Force Base.

(2)  SR-235.  From Route 89 in Ogden north to Route 134 in North Ogden.

(3)  SR-240.  From Route 15 east to Route 38 in Honeyville.



Amended by Chapter 57, 2008 General Session

